Florida, session 2026, SB7016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (7) of section 13 288.075, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 288.075âConfidentiality of records.â 15 (7)âLOAN PROGRAMS.â 16 (c)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 17 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 18 repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from 19 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 20 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.